Washington statutes.
RCW 35.37.040

Authority to contract debts—Limits.

Every city and town, may, without a vote of the people, contract indebtedness or borrow money for strictly municipal purposes on the credit of the city or town and issue negotiable bonds therefor in an amount which when added to its existing nonvoter approved indebtedness will not exceed the amount of indebtedness authorized by chapter 39.36 RCW, as now or hereafter amended, to be incurred without the assent of the voters.

When bonds are issued under this section the ordinance providing therefor shall contain a statement showing the value of the taxable property in the city or town, as the term "value of the taxable property" is defined in RCW 39.36.015, together with the amount of the existing nonvoter approved and total indebtedness of the city or town, which indebtedness shall include the amount for which such bonds are issued.

[ 1984 c 186 s 15; 1970 ex.s. c 42 s 12; 1965 c 7 s 35.37.040. Prior: (i) 1891 c 128 s 1; RRS s 9538. (ii) 1891 c 128 s 6, part; RRS s 9544, part.]

NOTES:

Purpose—1984 c 186: See note following RCW 39.46.110.

Severability—Effective date—1970 ex.s. c 42: See notes following RCW 39.36.015.

Limitations upon indebtedness: State Constitution Art. 7 s 2 (Amendments 55, 59), Art. 8 s 6 (Amendment 27), chapter 39.36 RCW, RCW 84.52.050.